Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program

205.6481.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly hereby finds that:

All citizens of the Commonwealth should have access to affordable health care; and

It is estimated by the Legislative Research Commission that one hundred twenty-five thousand (125,000) children in the Commonwealth have no health insurance coverage; and

Of the estimated one hundred twenty-five thousand (125,000) uninsured children in the Commonwealth, ninety-one thousand two hundred fifty (91,250) fall at or below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level; and

Uninsured children are of particular concern because of their need for preventative and primary care to develop into healthy adulthood; and

Measures not taken now to provide care for uninsured children will result in higher human and financial costs due to the development of more severe conditions; and

Eligible children in this Commonwealth should have access to cost-effective, primary health care programs if they or their parents are unable to afford it on their own; and

It is in the interest of the citizens of the Commonwealth for the General Assembly to foster the development of a children’s health insurance program designed to provide basic services to eligible children at minimum cost.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 253, § 1, effective April 2, 1998.

205.6483.
Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program — Purposes.

There is hereby created within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program (KCHIP) for the purposes of:

Providing health care coverage and other coordinated services to children through the age of eighteen (18) years at or below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level and who are not otherwise eligible for health insurance coverage through either expansions of Medicaid services under Title XIX of the Federal Social Security Act and through the provision of a separate health insurance program under Title XXI of the Federal Social Security Act, or a combination of Medicaid program expansions and use of a separate health insurance program; and

Providing Medicaid coverage for children between the ages of fourteen (14) and eighteen (18) years up to one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty level.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 253, § 2, effective April 2, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 260, effective June 20, 2005.

205.6485.
State child health plan — Eligibility criteria — Schedule of benefits — Premium contributions — Access. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall prepare a state child health plan meeting the requirements of Title XXI of the Federal Social Security Act, for submission to the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services within such time as will permit the state to receive the maximum amounts of federal matching funds available under Title XXI. The cabinet shall, by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, establish the following:

The eligibility criteria for children covered by the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program. However, no person eligible for services under Title XIX of the Social Security Act 42 U.S.C. 1396 to 1396v, as amended, shall be eligible for services under the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program except to the extent that Title XIX coverage is expanded by KRS 205.6481 to 205.6495 and KRS 304.17A-340;

The schedule of benefits to be covered by the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program, which shall include preventive services, vision services including glasses, and dental services including at least sealants, extractions, and fillings, and which shall be at least equivalent to one (1) of the following:

The standard Blue Cross/Blue Shield preferred provider option under the Federal Employees Health Benefit Plan established by U.S.C. sec. 8903(1);

A mid-range health benefit coverage plan that is offered and generally available to state employees; or

Health insurance coverage offered by a health maintenance organization that has the largest insured commercial, non-Medicaid enrollment of covered lives in the state;

The premium contribution per family of health insurance coverage available under the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program with provisions for the payment of premium contributions by families of children eligible for coverage by the program based upon a sliding scale relating to family income. Premium contributions shall be based on a six (6) month period not to exceed:

Ten dollars ($10), to be paid by a family with income between one hundred percent (100%) to one hundred thirty-three percent (133%) of the federal poverty level;

Twenty dollars ($20), to be paid by a family with income between one hundred thirty-four percent (134%) to one hundred forty-nine percent (149%) of the federal poverty level; and

One hundred twenty dollars ($120), to be paid by a family with income between one hundred fifty percent (150%) to two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level, and which may be made on a partial payment plan of twenty dollars ($20) per month or sixty dollars ($60) per quarter;

There shall be no copayments for services provided under the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program; and

The criteria for health services providers and insurers wishing to contract with the Commonwealth to provide the children’s health insurance coverage. However, the cabinet shall provide, in any contracting process for the preventive health insurance program, the opportunity for a public health department to bid on preventive health services to eligible children within the public health department’s service area. A public health department shall not be disqualified from bidding because the department does not currently offer all the services required by paragraph (b) of this subsection. The criteria shall be set forth in administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A and shall maximize competition among the providers and insurers. The Cabinet for Finance and Administration shall provide oversight over contracting policies and procedures to assure that the number of applicants for contracts is maximized.

Within twelve (12) months of federal approval of the state’s Title XXI child health plan, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall assure that a KCHIP program is available to all eligible children in all regions of the state. If necessary, in order to meet this assurance, the cabinet shall institute its own program.

KCHIP recipients shall have direct access without a referral from any gatekeeper primary care provider to dentists for covered primary dental services and to optometrists and ophthalmologists for covered primary eye and vision services.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 253, § 3, effective April 2, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 261, effective June 20, 2005; 2021 ch. 62, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

205.6485.
State child health plan — Eligibility criteria — Schedule of benefits — Premium contributions — Access. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall prepare a state child health plan meeting the requirements of Title XXI of the Federal Social Security Act, for submission to the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services within such time as will permit the state to receive the maximum amounts of federal matching funds available under Title XXI. The cabinet shall, by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, establish the following:

The eligibility criteria for children covered by the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program. However, no person eligible for services under Title XIX of the Social Security Act 42 U.S.C. 1396 to 1396v, as amended, shall be eligible for services under the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program except to the extent that Title XIX coverage is expanded by KRS 205.6481 to 205.6495 and KRS 304.17A-340;

The schedule of benefits to be covered by the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program, which shall include preventive services, vision services including glasses, and dental services including at least sealants, extractions, and fillings, and which shall be at least equivalent to one (1) of the following:

The standard Blue Cross/Blue Shield preferred provider option under the Federal Employees Health Benefit Plan established by U.S.C. sec. 8903(1);

A mid-range health benefit coverage plan that is offered and generally available to state employees; or

Health insurance coverage offered by a health maintenance organization that has the largest insured commercial, non-Medicaid enrollment of covered lives in the state;

The premium contribution per family of health insurance coverage available under the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program with provisions for the payment of premium contributions by families of children eligible for coverage by the program based upon a sliding scale relating to family income. Premium contributions shall be based on a six (6) month period not to exceed:

Ten dollars ($10), to be paid by a family with income between one hundred percent (100%) to one hundred thirty-three percent (133%) of the federal poverty level;

Twenty dollars ($20), to be paid by a family with income between one hundred thirty-four percent (134%) to one hundred forty-nine percent (149%) of the federal poverty level; and

One hundred twenty dollars ($120), to be paid by a family with income between one hundred fifty percent (150%) to two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level, and which may be made on a partial payment plan of twenty dollars ($20) per month or sixty dollars ($60) per quarter;

There shall be no copayments for services provided under the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program; and

The criteria for health services providers and insurers wishing to contract with the Commonwealth to provide the children’s health insurance coverage. However, the cabinet shall provide, in any contracting process for the preventive health insurance program, the opportunity for a public health department to bid on preventive health services to eligible children within the public health department’s service area. A public health department shall not be disqualified from bidding because the department does not currently offer all the services required by paragraph (b) of this subsection. The criteria shall be set forth in administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A and shall maximize competition among the providers and insurers. The Cabinet for Finance and Administration shall provide oversight over contracting policies and procedures to assure that the number of applicants for contracts is maximized.

Within twelve (12) months of federal approval of the state’s Title XXI child health plan, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall assure that a KCHIP program is available to all eligible children in all regions of the state. If necessary, in order to meet this assurance, the cabinet shall institute its own program.

KCHIP recipients shall have direct access without a referral from any gatekeeper primary care provider to dentists for covered primary dental services and to optometrists and ophthalmologists for covered primary eye and vision services.

The Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Plan shall comply with Sections 1 and 2 of this Act.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 253, § 3, effective April 2, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 261, effective June 20, 2005; 2021 ch. 62, § 2, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 19, § 10, effective January 1, 2023.

205.6487.
Establishment of trust fund — Maintenance.

A “Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program Trust Fund” shall be established for the purpose of receiving all appropriated funds, premiums, or other revenue received by the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program to be used for the payment of costs and services associated with the administration of the program. Appropriations made to the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program trust fund shall not lapse at the end of a fiscal year but shall be carried forward in the trust fund account and shall be available for allotment for its particular purpose in the next fiscal year.

The Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance trust fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, and grants, including federal funds. Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program trust fund shall be invested as provided for in KRS 42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be credited to the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program trust fund account.

The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall, by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, provide for the administration of the trust fund.

In administering the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program, the administrative costs under the program shall be limited to no more than ten percent (10%) of applicable program costs.

The trust fund shall administer any savings from the implementation of the cabinet’s Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program through managed care and shall use those savings to provide state matching funds for any enhanced federal funds available under Title XXI of the Federal Social Security Act.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 253, § 4, effective April 2, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 262, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 80, § 36, effective June 29, 2017.

205.6489.
Administration — Outreach — Data collection.

The Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program shall be administered by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in terms of conducting eligibility determination and providing oversight over enrollment and claims payment.

The program shall include a system of outreach and referral for children who may be eligible for the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program. The program shall work with the Department for Medicaid Services, the Department for Community Based Services, schools, pediatricians, public health departments, and other entities interested in the health of children in developing the system of outreach and referral.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish a structure for quality assurance and utilization review under KRS 205.6481 to 205.6495 and KRS 304.17A-340.

The Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program shall collect, analyze, and publicly disseminate comprehensive data on the number of children enrolled in the program, services received through the program, and the effect on health outcomes of children served by the program including the special health needs of minority children. The information collected by the program shall be subject to KRS 216.2927(1). The program shall have access to all data collected by the cabinet under KRS 216.2920 to 216.2929 and shall coordinate program data collection efforts with the data collection efforts of the cabinet under KRS 216.2920 to 216.2929.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 253, § 5, effective April 2, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 36, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 263, effective June 20, 2005.

205.6491.
Advisory council. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 253, § 6, effective April 2, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 264, effective June 20, 2005; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

205.6495.
Short title for KRS 205.6481 to 205.6495 and KRS 304.17A-340.

KRS 205.6481 to 205.6495 and KRS 304.17A-340 shall be known as the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program Act.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 253, § 7, effective April 2, 1998.

205.6497.
Required provisions in plans.

As permitted by federal law, in any plan submitted for federal Title XXI approval of a children’s health insurance program for Kentucky, the cabinet shall include provisions for a preventive health insurance program for children with no copayment, deductible, coinsurance, or premium.

The plan referred to in subsection (1) of this section shall include preventive dental services, tooth extraction, and emergency dental services.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 253, § 9, effective April 2, 1998.